District of Columbia statutes.
6-651.01

Transfer or use of chancery.

After October 13, 1964, no building or chancery being used by a foreign government in the District of Columbia shall be transferred to or used by another foreign government unless such use is in accordance with § 6-641.06, as amended, or unless such use was in accordance with applicable law on October 13, 1964.

Oct. 13, 1964, 78 Stat. 1092, Pub. L. 88-659, § 4
July 21, 1968, 82 Stat. 396, Pub. L. 90-412, § 1(b)
This section is referenced in § 6-651.02.
1981 Ed., § 5-421.
1973 Ed., § 5-418c.